Missouri, session 2026, HB3482.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 173.1104, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 173.1104, to read as follows:
173.1104. 1. An applicant shall be eligible for initial or renewed financial assistance
only if, at the time of application and throughout the period during which the applicant is
receiving such assistance, the applicant:
(1) Is a citizen or a permanent resident of the United States;
(2) Is a resident of the state of Missouri, as determined by reference to standards
promulgated by the coordinating board; and
(3) Is enrolled, or has been accepted for enrollment, as a full-time undergraduate
student in an approved private, public, or virtual institution[; and
(4) Is not enrolled or does not intend to use the award to enroll in a course of study
leading to a degree in theology or divinity].
2. If an applicant is found guilty of or pleads guilty to any criminal offense during the
period of time in which the applicant is receiving financial assistance, such applicant shall not
be eligible for renewal of such assistance, provided such offense would disqualify the
applicant from receiving federal student aid under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of
1965, as amended.
3. Financial assistance shall be allotted for one academic year, but a recipient shall be
eligible for renewed assistance until he or she has obtained a baccalaureate degree, provided
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3482 2
such financial assistance shall not exceed a total of ten semesters or fifteen quarters or their
equivalent. Standards of eligibility for renewed assistance shall be the same as for an initial
award of financial assistance, except that for renewal, an applicant shall demonstrate a grade-
point average of two and five-tenths on a four-point scale, or the equivalent on another scale.
This subsection shall be construed as the successor to section 173.215 for purposes of
eligibility requirements of other financial assistance programs that refer to section 173.215.
✔